Washington statutes.
RCW 35.73.060

Improvement district bonds—Issuance.

(1) The city may, in its discretion, by general or special ordinance, or both, instead of requiring immediate payment for the said work to be made by the owners of property included in the assessment roll, authorize the issuance of interest bearing bonds or warrants of the local improvement district, payable on or before a date not to exceed twelve years from and after their date. The bonds may be issued subject to call, the amount of the said assessment to be payable in installments or otherwise, and the bonds to be of such terms as may be provided in the ordinances and to bear interest at such rate or rates as may be prescribed in the ordinances. Such bonds or warrants may be of any form, including bearer bonds or bearer warrants, or registered bonds or registered warrants as provided in RCW 39.46.030.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, such bonds or warrants may be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1983 c 167 s 62; 1981 c 156 s 9; 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.73.060. Prior: 1915 c 87 s 1, part; 1907 c 243 s 5, part; RRS s 9430, part.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.